California statutes. Labor Code
(2) The covered entity, covered services employer, or physician entity shall provide all funding to their eligible employees and eligible physicians within 60 days of receipt from the department. The covered entity, covered services employer, or physician entity shall attest, in a form and manner specified by the department and under penalty of perjury, that all funding received pursuant to this section was provided within 60 days of receipt from the department.

(3) The covered entity, covered services employer, or physician entity shall immediately return to the department any funding received pursuant to this section that is not distributed within 60 days of receipt from the department. The
 department shall return the funds to the original appropriation and the Department of Finance may transfer any unspent or returned funds from the original appropriation to the General Fund.

(4) The covered entity, covered services employer, or physician entity shall report to the department within 90 days of receipt of funds information on the number of eligible employees or eligible physicians paid by profession type, the total amount of payments made including covered entity or covered services employer matching funds for eligible employees, and information on the timing of payments.

(5) The covered employer, covered services employer, or physician entity shall not use the funding to supplant other payments from the covered employer, covered services employer, or physician entity to the eligible full-time employee, eligible part-time employee, or eligible physician.

(e) (1) The department may make payments described in this section to covered entities and eligible physicians using the existing Medi-Cal Checkwrite system. Except as required by federal law, any payments made pursuant to this section shall be exempt from any adjustments or deductions made by the department to Medi-Cal payments made to covered entities or eligible physicians, including, but not limited to, provider withholds or provider payment reductions.

(2) Payments made pursuant to this section to covered entities, covered services employers, physician entities, or eligible physicians shall not be considered as payments for patient care or medical services.

(3) The Department of Health Care Access and Information, in consultation with appropriate stakeholders, shall release a technical letter
 to instruct covered entities, physician entities, and eligible physicians in how to report this revenue through the established health care financial reports, including, but not limited to, those required under Section 128810 of the Health and Safety Code, or Section 97040 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(f) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purposes of implementing this part. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this subdivision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and from the State Administrative and State Contracting manuals, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General
 Services.

(g) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department and the Department of Health Care Access and Information may implement, interpret, or make specific this part, in whole or in part, by means of information notices or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(h) The Legislature finds and declares that this section is a state law within the meaning of Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(i) This part shall be implemented only to the extent that the department determines that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is not jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 37.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1493.

(a) In the event of a dispute about the status of an employee as a full-time eligible employee, part-time eligible employee, the retention payment amount, or the covered entity’s or covered service employer’s failure to make a retention payment, the employee or a labor organization that represents the employee may write to the employer and request a review of the employee’s eligibility status, retention payment amount, or the employer’s failure to make a retention payment. The employer shall have 30 days to review the employee’s request, disclose to the employee the amount received from the department subject to the methodology described in subdivision (d) of Section 1492, and cure any alleged deficiency without damages.

(b) If the covered
 entity or covered services employer does not conclude the retention payment review described in subdivision (a) within 30 days of receipt of the review request, or the employer does not cure the alleged deficiency within 30 days of receipt of the review request, and the alleged deficiency is five hundred dollars ($500) or less the employee may file a complaint with the Labor Commissioner as provided in Section 98. If the Labor Commissioner finds that the covered entity or covered services employer is liable for failing to make a required retention payment, the covered entity or covered services employer shall be ordered to make full payment of the unpaid amount, plus interest at the rate of interest specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code, which shall accrue from the date that the retention payment funds were transmitted to the covered entity or covered services employer by the department as provided in Section 1492. A covered entity or covered services employer that willfully fails to
 make a full retention payment after receiving a request for review described in subdivision (a) shall be liable to the employee for liquidated damages in an amount equal to the unpaid amount.

(c) If the covered entity or covered services employer does not conclude the retention payment review described in subdivision (a) within 30 days of receipt of the review request, or does not cure the alleged deficiency within 30 days of receipt of the review request, and the alleged deficiency is greater than five hundred dollars ($500) the employee may file a complaint with the Labor Commissioner as provided in Section 98 or the employee may file a civil action in court to recover the deficiency. If the Labor Commissioner or court finds that the covered entity or covered services employer is liable for failing to make a required retention payment, or designate an employee for such payment, the covered entity or covered services employer shall be ordered
 to make full payment of the unpaid amount, plus interest at the rate of interest specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code, which shall accrue from the date that the retention payment funds were transmitted to the covered entity or covered services employer by the department as provided in Section 1492 or from the date a covered employer or covered services employer should have designated an employee for such payment. A covered entity or covered services employer that willfully fails to make a full retention payment after receiving a request for review described in subdivision (a) shall be liable to the employee for liquidated damages in an amount equal to the unpaid amount. In any civil action brought by an employee for the nonpayment of retention payments, the court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to a prevailing employee.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department shall not be liable for any
 payment, interest, liquidated damages or attorney’s fees and costs awarded to an employee pursuant to this section, and shall not be required to indemnify a covered entity or covered services employer for any such liability they incur pursuant to this section.

(e) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this part, including investigating an alleged violation, and ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate the violation or to maintain the status quo pending the completion of a full investigation or hearing through the procedures set forth in Sections 98, 98.3, or 1197.1, including by issuance of a citation against an employer who violates this article, and by filing a civil action. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set out in Section 1197.1, as appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 37.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1494.

(a) In the event of a dispute about the status of an eligible physician, the retention payment amount, or the physician entity’s failure to make a retention payment, the physician may write to the physician entity and request a review of the physician’s eligibility status, retention payment amount, or the physician entity’s failure to make a retention payment. The physician entity shall have 30 days to review the physician’s request, disclose to the physician the amount received from the department subject to the methodology described in subdivision (d) of Section 1492, and cure any alleged deficiency without penalty.

(b) If the physician entity does not conclude the retention payment review described in subdivision (a) within 30 days of receipt
 of the review request, or the physician entity does not cure the alleged deficiency within 30 days of receipt of the review request, the employee may file a complaint with the department. If the department finds that the physician entity failed to make a required retention payment, the physician entity shall be ordered to make full payment of the unpaid amount, plus interest at the rate of interest specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code, which shall accrue from the date that the retention payment funds were transmitted to the physician entity by the department as provided in Section 1492. A physician employer that willfully fails to make a full retention payment after receiving a request for review described in subdivision (a) shall be liable to the employee for liquidated damages in an amount equal to the unpaid amount.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not be required to indemnify a physician
 entity for any liability it incurs pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 37.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1495.

(a) In serving as a conduit for the retention payments under this part, covered entities, covered services employers, and physician entities are carrying out a state program. This part does not create a private right of action in any civil litigation against covered entities, covered services employers, and physician entities regarding the administration of the retention payment program and in the receipt and transmittal of retention payment program funds.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, retention payments described in this part are not wages as defined in Section 200.

(c) Except as provided in Sections 1493 and 1494, and notwithstanding any other law, covered entities, covered
 services employers, physician entities, and the department shall not be liable for damages awarded under Section 3294 of the Civil Code, Sections 2698 to 2699.5, or other damages imposed primarily for the sake of example and by way of punishing the defendant, in any civil litigation related to the retention payments described in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 37.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. Civil Air Patrol [1500. - 1507.]

1500.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Civil Air Patrol Employment Protection Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 485)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.

In this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Civil Air Patrol leave” means leave requested by an employee who is a volunteer member of the California Wing of the civilian auxiliary of the United States Air Force commonly known as the Civil Air Patrol and who has been duly directed and authorized by the United States Air Force, the California Emergency Management Agency, or other political subdivision of the State of California that has the authority to authorize an emergency operational mission of the California Wing of the Civil Air Patrol, to respond to an emergency operational mission, within or outside of the state, of the California Wing of the Civil Air Patrol.

(b) “Employee” means a person who may be permitted, required, or directed by an employer for wages or pay to engage in any employment and who has been employed by that employer for at least a 90-day period immediately preceding the commencement of leave, if otherwise eligible for leave.

(c) “Employee benefits” means all benefits, other than salary and wages, provided or made available to an employee by an employer and includes group life insurance, health insurance, disability insurance, and pensions, regardless of whether benefits are provided by a policy or practice of an employer.

(d) “Employer” means any person, partnership, corporation, association, or other business entity; or the State of California, a municipality, or other unit of local government; that employs more than 15 employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 485)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1502.

An employer shall not discriminate against or discharge from employment a member of the Civil Air Patrol because of such membership and shall not hinder or prevent a member from performing service as part of the California Wing of the Civil Air Patrol during an emergency operational mission of the California Wing of the Civil Air Patrol for which a member is entitled to leave under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 485)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1503.

(a) (1) An employer shall provide not less than 10 days per calendar year of unpaid Civil Air Patrol leave to an employee responding to an emergency operational mission of the California Wing of the Civil Air Patrol. Civil Air Patrol leave for a single emergency operational mission shall not exceed three days, unless an extension of time is granted by the governmental entity that authorized the emergency operational mission, and the extension of the leave is approved by the employer.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an employer is not required to
 grant Civil Air Patrol leave to an employee who is required to respond to either the same or other simultaneous emergency operational mission as a first responder or disaster service worker for a local, state, or federal agency.

(b) (1) An employee shall give the employer as much notice as possible of the intended dates upon which the Civil Air Patrol leave will begin and end.

(2) An employer may require certification from the proper Civil Air Patrol authority to verify the eligibility of the employee for the leave requested or taken. The employer may deny the
 leave to be taken as Civil Air Patrol leave if the employee fails to provide the required certification.

(c) An employee taking leave under this part shall not be required to exhaust all accrued vacation leave, personal leave, compensatory leave, sick leave, disability leave, and any other leave that may be available to the employee in order to take Civil Air Patrol leave.

(d) Nothing in this act prevents an employer from providing paid leave for leave taken pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 485)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1504.

(a) An employer shall, upon expiration of a leave authorized by this part, restore an employee to the position held by him or her when the leave began or to a position with equivalent seniority status, employee benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment. An employer may decline to restore an employee as required in this subdivision because of conditions unrelated to the exercise of rights under this part by the employee.

(b) An employer and an employee may negotiate for the employer to maintain the benefits of the employee at the expense of the employer during the leave.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 485)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1505.

(a) Taking Civil Air Patrol leave under this part shall not result in the loss of an employee benefit accrued before the date on which the leave began.

(b) This part does not affect the obligation of an employer to comply with any collective bargaining agreement or employee benefit plan that provides greater leave rights to employees than the rights provided under this part.

(c) The rights provided under this part shall not be diminished by any collective bargaining agreement or employee benefit plan entered into on or after January 1, 2010.

(d) This part does not affect or diminish the contract rights or seniority
 status of an employee not entitled to Civil Air Patrol leave.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 485)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1506.

(a) An employer shall not interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise or the attempt to exercise a right established by this part.

(b) An employer shall not discharge, fine, suspend, expel, discipline, or in any other manner discriminate against an employee who does any of the following:

(1) Exercises a right provided under this part.

(2) Opposes a practice made unlawful by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 485)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1507.

(a) An employee may bring a civil action in the superior court of the appropriate county to enforce this part.

(b) The court may enjoin any act or practice that violates this part and may order any equitable relief necessary and appropriate to redress the violation or to enforce this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 485)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.5. ORGAN AND BONE MARROW DONATION [1508. - 1513.]

1508.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Michelle Maykin Memorial Donation Protection Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1509.

For purposes of this part, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Employee” and “employee benefits” have the same meanings set forth in Section 1501.

(b) “Employer” means any person, partnership, corporation, association, or other business entity that employs 15 or more employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 195.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1510.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), an employer shall grant to an employee the following paid leaves of absence:

(1) A leave of absence, not exceeding 30 business days in a one-year period, to an employee who is an organ donor, for the purpose of donating the employee’s organ to another person. The one-year period is measured from the date the employee’s leave begins and shall consist of 12 consecutive months.

(2) A leave of absence, not exceeding five business days in a one-year period, to an employee who is a bone marrow donor, for the purpose of donating the employee’s bone marrow to another person. The one-year period is measured from the date the employee’s leave begins and shall consist of 12
 consecutive months.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), an employer shall grant an additional unpaid leave of absence, not exceeding 30 business days in a one-year period, to an employee who is an organ donor, for the purpose of donating the employee’s organ to another person. The one-year period is measured from the date the employee’s leave begins and shall consist of 12 consecutive months.

(c) In order to receive a leave of absence pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) an employee shall provide written verification to the employer that the employee is an organ or bone marrow donor and that there is a medical necessity for the donation of the organ or bone marrow.

(d) Any period of time during which an employee is required to be absent from the employee’s position by reason of being an organ or bone marrow donor is not a
 break in the employee’s continuous service for the purpose of the employee’s right to salary adjustments, sick leave, vacation, paid time off, annual leave, or seniority. During any period that an employee takes leave pursuant to subdivision (a), the employer shall maintain and pay for coverage under a group health plan, as defined in Section 5000(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, for the full duration of the leave, in the same manner the coverage would have been maintained if the employee had been actively at work during the leave period.

(e) This part does not affect the obligation of an employer to comply with a collective bargaining agreement or employee benefit plan that provides greater leave rights to employees than the rights provided under this part.

(f) The rights provided under this part shall not be diminished by a collective bargaining agreement or employee
 benefit plan entered into on or after January 1, 2011.

(g) An employer may require, as a condition of an employee’s initial receipt of bone marrow or organ donation leave, that an employee take up to five days of earned but unused sick leave, vacation, or paid time off for bone marrow donation and up to two weeks of earned but unused sick leave, vacation, or paid time off for organ donation, unless doing so would violate the provisions of any applicable collective bargaining agreement.

(h) Notwithstanding existing law, bone marrow and organ donation leave shall not be taken concurrently with any leave taken pursuant to the federal Family and Medical Leave Act of 1993 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 2601 et seq.) or the Moore-Brown-Roberti Family Rights Act (Sections 12945.2 and 19702.3 of the Government Code).

(i) Leave provided for
 pursuant to this section may be taken in one or more periods, but in no event shall exceed the amount of leave prescribed in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 316, Sec. 6.   (AB 1223)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1511.

An employer shall, upon expiration of a leave authorized by this part, restore an employee to the position held by him or her when the leave began or to a position with equivalent seniority status, employee benefits, pay, and other terms and conditions of employment. An employer may decline to restore an employee as required in this section because of conditions unrelated to the exercise of rights under this part by the employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1512.

(a) An employer shall not interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise or the attempt to exercise a right established by this part.

(b) An employer shall not discharge, fine, suspend, expel, discipline, or in any other manner discriminate against an employee who does either of the following:

(1) Exercises a right provided under this part.

(2) Opposes a practice made unlawful by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1513.

(a) An employee may bring a civil action in the superior court of the appropriate county to enforce this part.

(b) The court may enjoin any act or practice that violates this part and may order any equitable relief necessary and appropriate to redress the violation or to enforce this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 646, Sec. 1.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.6. WORKPLACE KNOW YOUR RIGHTS [1550. - 1559.]

1550.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Workplace Know Your Rights Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1551.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that California workers have a strong understanding of their rights as workers, as well as their constitutional rights.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature to equip workers with knowledge of their rights that they can also use to protect their families, neighbors, and communities at a time of potential disruption, dislocation, and fear for many Californians.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1552.

For purposes of this part, “authorized representative” means an exclusive collective bargaining representative.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1553.

(a) On or before February 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, an employer shall provide a stand-alone written notice to each current
 employee pursuant to this section in a manner the employer normally uses to communicate employment-related information. The notice may include, but is not limited to, personal service, email, or text message, if it can reasonably be anticipated to be received by the employee within one business day of sending. The written notice shall also be provided to each new employee upon hire. Written notice shall also be annually provided to the employee’s authorized representative, if any, by either electronic or regular mail. The notice shall contain a description of workers’ rights in the following areas:

(1) The right to workers’ compensation benefits, including disability pay and medical care for work-related injuries or
 illness, as well as the contact information for the Division of Workers’ Compensation.

(2) The right to notice of inspection by immigration agencies pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 90.2.

(3) Protection against unfair immigration-related practices against a person exercising protected rights.

(4) The right to organize a union or engage in concerted activity in the workplace.

(5) Constitutional rights when interacting with law enforcement at the workplace, including an employee’s right under the Fourth Amendment to the United States Constitution to be free from unreasonable searches and seizures and rights under the Fifth Amendment to the United States Constitution to due process and against self-incrimination.

(b) The notice shall also contain both of the following:

(1) A description of new legal developments pertaining to laws enforced by the Labor and Workforce Development Agency that the Labor Commissioner deems material and necessary. The Labor Commissioner shall include a list of those developments, if any, in the template notice described in paragraph (a) of Section 1554. 

(2) A list, developed by the Labor Commissioner, of the enforcement agencies that may enforce the underlying rights in the notice. The Labor Commissioner shall include this list in the template notice described in paragraph (a) of Section 1554.

(c) The written notice shall be provided to an employee in the language the employer normally uses to communicate employment-related information to the employee
 and which the employee understands if the template notice is available in that language on the Labor Commissioner’s internet website. If the template notice is not available in that language, then the written notice may be provided in English.

(d) An employer may, in addition to the required written notice, choose to provide a link to, or show, the video developed by the Labor Commissioner’s office pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1554.

(e) An employer shall keep records of compliance with the requirements of this section for three years, including the date that each written notice is provided or sent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1554.

(a) The Labor Commissioner shall develop a template notice that an employer may use to comply with the requirements of Section 1553. On or before January 1, 2026, the Labor Commissioner shall post the template notice on its internet website so that it is accessible to an employer. The Labor Commissioner shall post an updated template notice annually thereafter. The template notice shall be written in plain terminology that is easily understood by a worker. The Labor
 Commissioner shall make the template notice available in different languages, including English, Spanish, Chinese, Tagalog, Vietnamese, Korean, Hindi, Urdu, and Punjabi. The Labor Commissioner may also provide the template notice in additional languages.

(b) On or before July 1, 2026, the Labor Commissioner shall develop a video for employees advising them of their rights under the areas listed in Section 1553. The
 Labor Commissioner shall make the video available in English and Spanish and may also make the video available in other languages.

(c) On or before July 1, 2026, the Labor Commissioner shall develop a video for employers advising them of their rights and requirements under the areas listed in Section 1553, including constitutional rights when interacting with law enforcement at the workplace.

(d) The Labor Commissioner shall post the videos developed pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) on the Labor Commissioner’s internet
 website.

(e) (1) The Labor Commissioner shall consult with the Agricultural Labor Relations Board and the Public Employment Relations Board in developing the template notice described in subdivision (a) and the videos described in subdivisions (b) and (c). The Agricultural Labor Relations Board and the Public Employment Relations Board shall provide suggested language for the template notice described in subdivision (a) and a suggested script for the videos described in subdivisions (b) and (c) to the Labor Commissioner regarding workers’ rights to organize, form, join, or assist a union, engage in collective bargaining, and participate in concerted activities for mutual aid or protection.

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall consult with the Attorney General’s office to develop
 suggested language for the template notice described in subdivision (a) and a suggested script for the videos described in subdivisions (b) and (c) regarding workers’ and employers’ constitutional rights when interacting with law enforcement at the workplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1555.

(a) If an employee has notified their employer that they would like their designated emergency contact to be notified in the event the employee is arrested or detained, the employer shall notify the designated emergency contact if the employee is arrested or detained on their worksite. If the arrest or detention occurs during work hours, or during the performance of the employee’s job duties, but not on the worksite, the employer shall notify the employee’s designated emergency contact only if the employer has actual knowledge of the arrest or detention of the employee.

(b) An employer shall provide an employee the opportunity to name an emergency contact no later than March 30, 2026, for an existing employee, and at the time of hiring for a new employee hired after March 30, 2026. The employer shall also allow an employee to provide updated emergency contact information through the duration of employment. The employer shall allow the employee to indicate whether the emergency contact should be notified if the employee is arrested or detained on their worksite, or during work hours or during the performance of the employee’s job duties, but not on the worksite, if the employer has actual knowledge of the arrest or detention of the
 employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1556.

Parties subject to this part may provide, by collective bargaining agreement, that the agreement supersedes the requirements of this part, in whole or in part, if the waiver is explicitly set forth in the agreement in clear and unambiguous terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1557.

An employer shall not discharge, threaten to discharge, demote, suspend, or in any manner discriminate or retaliate against an employee for exercising or attempting to exercise their rights under this part, filing a complaint with the Labor Commissioner alleging a violation of this part, cooperating in an investigation or prosecution of an alleged violation of this part, or for any action taken by an employee to invoke, or assist in any manner in, the enforcement of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1558.

(a) The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this part, including investigating an alleged violation, and ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate a violation or maintain the status quo pending the completion of a full investigation or hearing through the procedures set forth in Section 98, 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, or 1197.1, including issuing a citation against an employer who violates this section and filing a civil action. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set out in Section 98.74 or
 1197.1, as applicable.

(b) This part may also alternatively be enforced by a public prosecutor pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 180) of Division 1.

(c) In any civil action brought pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the petitioner may seek appropriate temporary or preliminary injunctive relief, including punitive damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), in addition to any other remedy, an employer who violates this part may be subject to a
 penalty of up to five hundred dollars ($500) per employee for each violation.

(2) The penalty for a violation of Section 1555 shall be an amount up to five hundred dollars ($500) per employee for each day the violation occurs, up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per employee.

(3) An employee, the Labor Commissioner, or a public prosecutor may recover a penalty under this part as a statutory penalty paid to the employee or a civil penalty, but not both, for the same violation.

(e) An action brought pursuant to this section may be brought in the superior court in any county in which the violation in question is alleged to have occurred or in
 which the employer resides or transacts business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1559.

This part does not preempt any city, county, or city and county ordinance that provides equal or greater protection to employees who are covered by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 667, Sec. 1.   (SB 294)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. LICENSING [1682. - 1706.5.]



  CHAPTER 3. Farm Labor Contractors [1682. - 1699.]

1682.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Person” includes any individual, firm, partnership, association, limited liability company, or corporation.

(b) “Farm labor contractor” designates any person who, for a fee, employs workers to render personal services in connection with the production of any farm products to, for, or under the direction of a third person, or who recruits, solicits, supplies, or hires workers on behalf of an employer engaged in the growing or producing of farm products, and who, for a fee, provides in connection therewith one or more of the following services: furnishes board, lodging, or transportation for those workers; supervises, times, checks, counts, weighs, or otherwise directs or measures their work; or disburses wage payments to these persons.

(c) “License” means a license issued by the Labor Commissioner to carry on the business, activities, or operations of a farm labor contractor under this chapter.

(d) “Licensee” means a farm labor contractor who holds a valid and unrevoked license under this chapter.

(e) “Fee” shall mean (1) the difference between the amount received by a labor contractor and the amount paid out by him or her to persons employed to render personal services to, for or under the direction of a third person; (2) any valuable consideration received or to be received by a farm labor contractor for or in connection with any of the services described above, and shall include the difference between any amount received or to be received by him or her, and the amount paid out by him or her, for or in connection with the rendering of such services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 183.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1682.3.

“Farm labor contractor” includes any “day hauler.” “Day hauler” means any person who is employed by a farm labor contractor to transport, or who for a fee transports, by motor vehicle, workers to render personal services in connection with the production of any farm products to, for, or under the direction of a third person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

1682.4.

“Farm labor contractor” does not include a commercial packing house engaged in both the harvesting and the packing of citrus fruit or soft fruit for a client or customer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 662, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1682.5.

This chapter does not apply to:

(a) A nonprofit corporation or organization with respect to services specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1682, which are performed for its members.

(b) Any person who performs the services specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1682 only within the scope of his employment by the third person on whose behalf he is so acting and not as an independent contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1834.)
-------------------------------------------

1682.7.

The Labor Commissioner shall ensure that the office maintained in Fresno has suitable facilities and sufficient personnel for the examination and licensing of farm labor contractors and for the processing of complaints against farm labor contractors or any agent of a farm labor contractor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 877, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1682.8.
